Washington statutes.
RCW 41.50.112

Report of member data—Department-designed format.

Employers, as defined in RCW 41.26.030, 41.32.010, 41.34.020, 41.35.010, and 41.40.010, must report all member data to the department in a format designed and communicated by the department. Employers failing to comply with this reporting requirement shall be assessed an additional fee as defined under RCW 41.50.110(5).

[ 2000 c 247 s 1107.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—Subchapter headings not law—2000 c 247: See RCW 41.40.931 and 41.40.932.